District of Columbia statutes.
3-1106

Donations.

The Commission may receive donations and grants, either in money or in kind, intended to promote the work of the Commission and shall hold all donations and grants in trust for the designated purpose. Any deposit of funds shall be made in coordination with the D.C. Comptroller.

History

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-183, § 7, 32 DCR 841
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 14, 33 DCR 7836

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3106.